hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Amerikai futball > Amerikaifutball-védőfelszerelés: Amerikai futball kar- és könyökvédők; Amerikai futball hátvédők; Amerikai futball cipővédők; Amerikaifutball-övek; Amerikaifutball-sisakkiegészítők; Amerikaifutball-sisakok; Amerikai futball fogvédők; Amerikaifutball-nyaktekercsek; Amerikai futball védőhüvelyek; Amerikaifutball-bordavédő pólók és mellények; Amerikaifutball-vállvédők
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Amerikansk fotboll > Amerikansk fotboll skyddsutrustning: Arm- och armbågsskydd för amerikansk fotboll; Ryggskydd för amerikansk fotboll; Skoskydd för amerikansk fotboll; Amerikansk fotboll bälten; Amerikansk fotboll hjälmtillbehör; Amerikansk fotboll hjälmar; Tandskydd för amerikansk fotboll; Amerikansk fotboll nackskydd; Skyddsärmar för amerikansk fotboll; Amerikansk fotboll överdelar & västar för bröstkorgsskydd; Amerikansk fotboll axelvaddar
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 美式足球 > 美式足球護具: 美式足球護臂與護肘; 美式足球護背板; 美式足球釘鞋套; 美式足球腰帶; 美式足球頭盔配件; 美式足球頭盔; 美式足球護齒; 美式足球護頸; 美式足球防護袖套; 美式足球胸肋防護上衣及背心; 美式足球胸肩墊
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Amerikkalainen jalkapallo > Suojavarusteet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo: Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon kyynär- ja käsivarsisuojat; Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon selkäsuojat; Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon nappulakenkien suojukset; Vyöt, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Kypäräasusteet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Kypärät, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon hammassuojat; Niskatuet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon suojahihat; Kylkiluita suojaavat paidat ja liivit, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Olkasuojukset, amerikkalainen jalkapallo
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Fútbol americano > Equipo de protección de fútbol americano: Coderas y protectores de brazo para fútbol americano; Placas de espalda para fútbol americano; Fundas para tacos de fútbol americano; Fajas de fútbol americano; Accesorios para cascos de fútbol americano; Cascos de fútbol americano; Protectores bucales para fútbol americano; Cuelleras de fútbol americano; Mangas protectoras para fútbol americano; Camisas y chalecos de protección de costillas de fútbol americano; Hombreras de fútbol americano
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > American Football > American Football Protective Gear: American Football Arm & Elbow Pads; American Football Back Plates; American Football Cleat Covers; American Football Girdles; American Football Helmet Accessories; American Football Helmets; American Football Mouthguards; American Football Neck Rolls; American Football Protective Sleeves; American Football Rib Protection Shirts & Vests; American Football Shoulder Pads
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Amerikan Futbolu > Amerikan Futbolu Koruyucu Ekipman: Amerikan futbolu kol ve dirseklikler; Amerikan futbolu sırt korumaları; Amerikan futbolu krampon kılıfları; Amerikan Futbolu Korseleri; Amerikan Futbolu Kask Aksesuarları; Amerikan Futbolu Kasklar; Amerikan futbolu ağızlıkları; Amerikan Futbolu Boyun Koruyucular; Amerikan futbolu koruyucu kollukları; Amerikan Futbolu Kaburga Koruyucu Tişörtler ve Yelekler; Amerikan Futbolu Omuz Dolguları
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > American Football > Schutzbekleidung für American Football: Arm- & Ellenbogenschoner für American Football; Back-Plates für American Football; Schuhüberzüge für American Football; Hosen mit Schutz für American Football; Helmzubehör für American Football; Helme für American Football; Mundschutz für American Football; Nackenpolster für American Football; Schutz-Sleeves für American Football; Shirts und Westen zum Schutz der Rippen für American Football; Schulterpolster für American Football
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Amerikansk fodbold – bold > Amerikansk fodbold – beskyttelsesudstyr: Arm- og albuebeskyttere til amerikansk fodbold; Rygplader til amerikansk fodbold; Overtræk til støvler til amerikansk fodbold; Amerikansk fodbold – girdle-bukser; Amerikansk fodbold – hjelmtilbehør; Amerikansk fodbold – hjelme; Tandbeskyttere til amerikansk fodbold; Amerikansk fodbold – nakkekraver; Beskyttende sleeves til amerikansk fodbold; Amerikansk fodbold – jerseys og veste med ribbenspolstring; Amerikansk fodbold – skulderpuder
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Football americano > Attrezzatura protettiva da football americano: Gomitiere e parabraccia da football americano; Paraschiena da football americano; Copriscarpe da football americano; Pantaloni imbottiti da football americano; Accessori per caschi da football americano; Caschi da football americano; Paradenti da football americano; Paracollo da football americano; Manicotti protettivi da football americano; Maglie e canotte con paracostole da football americano; Paraspalle da football americano
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Американский футбол > Защитная экипировка для американского футбола: Налокотники и защита рук для американского футбола; Защита спины (бэкплейты) для американского футбола; Чехлы для бутс для американского футбола; Защитные шорты для американского футбола; Аксессуары для шлемов для американского футбола; Шлемы для американского футбола; Капы для американского футбола; Защита шеи для американского футбола; Защитные рукава для американского футбола; Футболки и жилеты для защиты ребер для американского футбола; Каркасы для американского футбола
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Amerikansk fotball > Beskyttelsesutstyr for amerikansk fotball: Arm- og albuebeskyttere til amerikansk fotball; Ryggplater til amerikansk fotball; Skotrekk til amerikansk fotball; Belter for amerikansk fotball; Hjelmtilbehør for amerikansk fotball; Hjelmer for amerikansk fotball; Tannbeskyttere til amerikansk fotball; Nakkeputer for amerikansk fotball; Beskyttelsesermer til amerikansk fotball; Skjorter og vester for brystbeskyttelse for amerikansk fotball; Skulderputer for amerikansk fotball
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > อเมริกันฟุตบอล > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันอเมริกันฟุตบอล: สนับแขนและข้อศอกอเมริกันฟุตบอล; แผ่นป้องกันหลังอเมริกันฟุตบอล; ปลอกหุ้มรองเท้าสตั๊ดอเมริกันฟุตบอล; ที่คาดเอวอเมริกันฟุตบอล; อุปกรณ์เสริมหมวกกันน็อคอเมริกันฟุตบอล; หมวกกันน็อคอเมริกันฟุตบอล; ยางสวมฟันอเมริกันฟุตบอล; ม้วนรองคออเมริกันฟุตบอล; ปลอกแขนกันกระแทกอเมริกันฟุตบอล; เสื้อกล้ามและเสื้อป้องกันซี่โครงอเมริกันฟุตบอล; แผ่นรองไหล่อเมริกันฟุตบอล
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Futebol Americano > Equipamento de Proteção de Futebol Americano: Proteções de braços e cotovelos de futebol americano; Proteções de costas de futebol americano; Capas para chuteiras de futebol americano; Calções Interiores de Proteção de Futebol Americano; Acessórios de Capacete de Futebol Americano; Capacetes de Futebol Americano; Goteiras de futebol americano; Suportes de Pescoço de Futebol Americano; Mangas de proteção de futebol americano; Camisas e Coletes de Proteção de Costelas de Futebol Americano; Proteções de Ombros de Futebol Americano
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > アメリカンフットボール > アメリカンフットボール用プロテクター: アメリカンフットボール用アーム・エルボーパッド; アメリカンフットボール用バックプレート; アメリカンフットボール用スパイクカバー; アメリカンフットボール用ガードル; アメリカンフットボール用ヘルメットアクセサリー; アメリカンフットボール用ヘルメット; アメリカンフットボール用マウスガード; アメリカンフットボール用ネックロール; アメリカンフットボール用プロテクティブスリーブ; アメリカンフットボール用リブプロテクションシャツ&ベスト; アメリカンフットボール用ショルダーパッド
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Ameriški nogomet > Zaščitna oprema za ameriški nogomet: Ščitniki za roke in komolce za ameriški nogomet; Ameriški nogomet Hrbtne plošče; Ameriški nogomet Prevleke za čevlje; Hlače za ameriški nogomet; Dodatki za čelade za ameriški nogomet; Čelade za ameriški nogomet; Ščitniki za zobe za ameriški nogomet; Zaščitni ovratniki za ameriški nogomet; Ameriški nogomet Zaščitni rokavi; Zaščitne majice in telovniki za ameriški nogomet; Ščitniki za ramena za ameriški nogomet
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Amerikietiškasis futbolas > Amerikietiškojo futbolo apsauginės priemonės: Amerikietiškojo futbolo rankų ir alkūnių apsaugos; Amerikietiško futbolo nugaros apsaugos plokštės; Amerikietiško futbolo batelių apdangalai; Amerikietiško futbolo juosmens apsaugos; Amerikietiškojo futbolo šalmų priedai; Amerikietiškojo futbolo šalmai; Amerikietiškojo futbolo burnos apsaugos; Amerikietiškojo futbolo apsauginės apykaklės; Amerikietiško futbolo apsauginės movos; Amerikietiškojo futbolo šonkaulius saugantys marškinėliai ir liemenės; Amerikietiškojo futbolo antpečiai
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Αμερικανικό ποδόσφαιρο > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου: Επιαγκωνίδες και προστατευτικά μπράτσου αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Προστατευτικά πλάτης αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Καλύμματα για παπούτσια με τάπες αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Ζώνες αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Αξεσουάρ κράνους αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Κράνη αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Μασελάκια αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Προστατευτικά αυχένα αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Προστατευτικά μανίκια αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Προστατευτικά μπλουζάκια & γιλέκα αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Επιθέματα ώμου αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 美式橄榄球 > 美式橄榄球护具: 美式橄榄球护臂与护肘; 美式橄榄球护背; 美式橄榄球钉鞋套; 美式橄榄球腰带; 美式橄榄球头盔配件; 美式橄榄球头盔; 美式橄榄球护齿; 美式橄榄球护颈; 美式橄榄球防护袖套; 美式橄榄球肋骨保护衬衫和背心; 美式橄榄球肩垫
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Americký futbal > Ochranné vybavenie pre americký futbal: Chrániče rúk a lakťov na americký futbal; Chrániče chrbta na americký futbal; Obaly na kopačky na americký futbal; Šortky na americký futbal; Príslušenstvo k prilbám na americký futbal; Prilby na americký futbal; Chrániče zubov na americký futbal; Nákrčníky na americký futbal; Ochranné návleky pre americký futbal; Ochranné tričká a vesty na americký futbal; Ramenné vypchávky na americký futbal
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Football américain > Équipements de protection pour le football américain: Coudières et protège-bras de football américain; Plaques arrière de football américain; Protège-crampons de football américain; Gaines de football américain; Accessoires pour casques de football américain; Casques de football américain; Protège-dents de football américain; Tours de cou pour le football américain; Manchons de protection de football américain; Maillots et gilets de protection des côtes pour le football américain; Épaulettes pour le football américain
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Fotbal american > Echipament de protecție pentru fotbal american: Protecții pentru brațe și cotiere pentru fotbal american; Plăci dorsale pentru fotbal american; Huse pentru crampoane de fotbal american; Brâuri de susținere pentru fotbal american; Accesorii pentru căști de fotbal american; Căști de fotbal american; Protectoare dentare pentru fotbal american; Rulouri pentru gât pentru fotbal american; Mâneci de protecție pentru fotbal american; Cămăși și veste de protecție pentru coaste pentru fotbal american; Protecții umeri pentru fotbal american
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Futbol amerykański > Ochraniacze do futbolu amerykańskiego: Ochraniacze na ramiona i łokcie do futbolu amerykańskiego; Ochraniacze pleców do futbolu amerykańskiego; Pokrowce na korki do futbolu amerykańskiego; Spodenki do futbolu amerykańskiego; Akcesoria do kasków do futbolu amerykańskiego; Kaski do futbolu amerykańskiego; Ochraniacze na zęby do futbolu amerykańskiego; Ochraniacze szyi do futbolu amerykańskiego (neck rolls); Rękawy ochronne do futbolu amerykańskiego; Koszulki i kamizelki chroniące żebra do futbolu amerykańskiego; Ochraniacze na ramiona do futbolu amerykańskiego
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng bầu dục Mỹ > Đồ bảo hộ chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ: Đệm bảo vệ cánh tay và cùi chỏ bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Đệm bảo vệ lưng bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Bọc giày đinh bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Dây đai chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Phụ kiện cho mũ bảo hiểm chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Mũ bảo hiểm chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Đệm bảo vệ hàm bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Vòng kẹp bảo vệ cổ chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Ống tay bảo vệ bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Áo bảo vệ sườn và áo lót chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Đệm vai chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Американски футбол > Защитна екипировка за американски футбол: Протектори за ръце и лакти за американски футбол; Протектори за гръб за американски футбол; Калъфи за бутонки за американски футбол; Долнища за американски футбол; Аксесоари за каска за американски футбол; Каски за американски футбол; Протектори за уста за американски футбол; Защита за врата при американски футбол; Защитни ръкави за американски футбол; Тениски и жилетки със защита на ребрата за американски футбол; Подплънки за рамена за американски футбол
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Americký fotbal > Ochranná výstroj pro americký fotbal: Chrániče paží a loktů na americký fotbal; Chrániče zad na americký fotbal; Návleky na kopačky na americký fotbal; Ochranné šortky pro americký fotbal; Doplňky k helmě pro americký fotbal; Helmy pro americký fotbal; Chrániče zubů na americký fotbal; Chrániče krku pro americký fotbal; Ochranné návleky na americký fotbal; Trička a vesty s chrániči žeber pro americký fotbal; Chrániče ramen pro americký fotbal
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > American Football > American Football beschermende uitrusting: Arm- en elleboogbeschermers voor American football; Rugbeschermers voor American football; Schoenhoezen voor American football; American Football girdles; American Football helmaccessoires; American Football helmen; Gebitsbeschermers voor American football; American Football nekbescherming; Beschermende mouwen voor American football; American Football shirts en vesten voor torsobescherming; American Football schouderpads
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Futebol americano > Equipamento de proteção para futebol americano: Cotoveleiras e braçadeiras de futebol americano; Protetores de costas para futebol americano; Capas para chuteira de futebol americano; Calças de futebol americano; Acessórios para capacete de futebol americano; Capacetes de futebol americano; Protetores bucais de futebol americano; Proteção para pescoço para futebol americano; Mangas de proteção para futebol americano; Coletes e camisas protetores de costela para futebol americano; Protetores de ombro para futebol americano
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Američki nogomet > Zaštitna oprema za američki nogomet: Štitnici za ruke i laktove za američki nogomet; Noseće ploče za američki nogomet; Navlake za krampone za američki nogomet; Pojasevi za američki nogomet; Dodaci za kacige za američki nogomet; Kacige za američki nogomet; Štitnici za zube za američki nogomet; Ovratnici za američki nogomet; Zaštitni rukavi za američki nogomet; Prsluci i majice za zaštitu rebara za američki nogomet; Jastučići za ramena za američki nogomet
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 아메리칸 풋볼 > 미식축구 보호 장비: 미식축구 팔 및 팔꿈치 패드; 미식축구 백 플레이트; 미식축구 클리트 커버; 미식축구 거들; 미식축구 헬멧 액세서리; 미식축구 헬멧; 미식축구 마우스가드; 미식축구 넥롤; 미식축구 보호 슬리브; 미식축구 갈비뼈 보호 셔츠/조끼; 미식축구 어깨 패드